Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3481.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 241.252, is amended to read: 241.252 deleted text begin FREEdeleted text end COMMUNICATION SERVICES FOR INCARCERATED PERSONS. Subdivision 1. deleted text begin Freedeleted text end Communication services. deleted text begin (a)deleted text end A state adult or juvenile facility under the control of the commissioner of corrections must deleted text begin provide incarcerated persons withdeleted text end new text begin offernew text end voice communication servicesnew text begin to incarcerated persons for a feenew text end . A facility may supplement voice communication services with other new text begin fee-based new text end communication services, including but not limited to video communication and email or electronic messaging services. deleted text begin A facility must at least continue to offer the services the facility offered as of January 1, 2023.deleted text end new text begin The fee charged for communication services must not exceed the actual cost of providing the services to incarcerated persons.new text end deleted text begin (b) To the extent that voice communication services are provided, which must not be limited beyond program participation and routine facility policies and procedures, neither the individual initiating the communication nor the individual receiving the communication must be charged for the service. deleted text end Subd. 2. Voice communication services restrictions. Nothing in this section allows an incarcerated person to violate an active protection order, harassment restraining order, or other no-contact order or directive. deleted text begin Subd. 3. deleted text end deleted text begin State revenue prohibited. deleted text end deleted text begin A state agency must not receive revenue from the provision of voice communication services or any other communication services under this deleted text end deleted text begin section, but an agency may collect commissions on communication services provided under any contract entered into before January 1, 2023. deleted text end Subd. 4. Visitation programs. (a) Facilities shall maintain in-person visits for incarcerated persons, and communication services must not be used to replace a facility's in-person visitation program. (b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a), the commissioner may waive the in-person visitation program requirement under this subdivision if there is: (1) a declared emergency under section 12.31; or (2) a local-, state-, or federal-declared natural disaster. Subd. 5. Reporting. The Department of Corrections must include the following information covering the previous calendar year in its annual performance report required under section 241.016: deleted text begin (1) its efforts to renegotiate the agency's communication contracts, including the rates the agency is paying or charging incarcerated people or community members for any and all services in the contracts; deleted text end new text begin (1) the amount of funds expended to provide communication services to incarcerated persons and the amount of revenue raised by telecommunication fees authorized under this section; new text end (2) a complete and detailed accounting of how legislatively appropriated funds for communication services are spentdeleted text begin , including spending on expenses previously covered by commissionsdeleted text end ; and (3) data on usage of all communication services, including monthly call and message volume. Subd. 6. Definitions. For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given: (1) "voice communications" means real-time, audio-only communication services, namely phone calls made over wireline telephony, voice over Internet protocol, or any other technology infrastructure; and (2) "other communication services" means communication services other than voice communications, including but not limited to video calls and electronic messages.